Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-127
State docket fee.

(1) In addition to all other court costs assessed according to law, a state docket fee shall be taxed as costs in each civil cause of action or traffic misdemeanor or infraction filed in the district courts and county courts in the following dollar amounts:

Case CategoryState Docket FeeCivil cause of action (district court)45.00Civil cause of action (county court) when the amount in controversy is:$1,500 or lessNo fee$1,500.01 to $7,500.0010.00$7,500.01 or more20.00Dissolution26.00Traffic misdemeanor or infraction36.00Small claims16.00

(2) The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the end of the month. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees to the General Fund.

(3) Notwithstanding section 29-2709, Title IV-D status, or the in forma pauperis status of any litigant, a county, city, or village shall not be required to pay the state docket fee in any case.

Laws 2026, LB935, § 35.
July 1, 2026